Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.120

Regents—Open public meetings—Vacancy not to affect rights of remaining members.

Meetings of the board of regents may be called in such manner as the board may prescribe and shall follow procedures for open public meetings in chapter 42.30 RCW. A full meeting of the board shall be called at least once a year. The board shall provide time for public comment at each meeting. No vacancy in said board shall impair the rights of the remaining members of the board.

[ 2012 c 228 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 103 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.120. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 248 s 12; RRS s 4592; prior: 1897 c 118 s 201; 1891 c 145 s 12. Formerly RCW 28.80.100.]

NOTES:

Present terms not affected—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 103: See notes following RCW 28B.20.100.